Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-9-101 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Kill zone” means the area within a twenty-five mile radius


of the site of:


a. the rupture of a carbon dioxide (CO ) pipeline, or



b. the release of CO from a CO pipeline, facility, or
2


sequestration site;





Req. No. 948 Page 1


2. “Owner” means any person that owns or operates a CO pipeline



or supplies CO to a CO pipeline, facility, or sequestration site;
2


and


3. “Victim” means any person that files a financing statement


for the purposes of perfecting a CO victim lien.



B. Any person residing, traveling through, visiting, or owning


or leasing property, agriculture, equipment, livestock, or pets, or


who is dependent on affected water sources located within the kill


zone of a CO pipeline, facility, or sequestration site shall have



claim to a CO victim lien. Such person shall have standing for



compensation for all damages incurred or projected to be incurred by


the person due to the rupture of a CO pipeline or the release of CO
2


from a CO pipeline, facility, or sequestration site. The lien shall



include full compensatory and punitive damages against all assets of


the owner of a CO pipeline or an owner supplying CO to a CO
2 2


pipeline at the time of the release of CO or the rupture of a CO
2


pipeline or sequestration site, regardless of intent or liability.


C. 1. To perfect a CO victim lien, a person shall file a UCC-1



financing statement within one (1) year from the date of the release


of CO or the rupture of a CO pipeline or sequestration site with
2


the county clerk’s office where the kill zone is located. A


perfected lien shall have priority retroactive to the date that the


CO was released or that the CO pipeline or sequestration site
2


ruptured or leaked and over any conflicting security interest or

Req. No. 948 Page 2


lien, including those perfected prior to the effective date of this


act.


2. A financing statement filed pursuant to this subsection


shall indicate that the statement is being filed to perfect a CO



victim lien. The financing statement shall remain effective until a


termination date is filed.


D. A victim shall file a termination statement within thirty


(30) days from the date that the victim receives a written demand


from an owner, or from the date that the owner performs all


obligations of the lien, whichever is later. The victim shall also


file a termination statement if the victim wishes to relinquish


rights to the CO victim lien.



E. If any owner at the subject of a CO victim lien is involved



in bankruptcy or receivership, the trustee, conservator, or court


responsible for reorganization or liquidation of the owner’s assets


shall hold the assets in trust for the benefit of potential CO



victim lienholders for a period not to exceed one (1) year from the


date of the owner’s last day of operating the CO pipeline or the



owner’s last day of creating CO to be supplied to a CO pipeline or
2


facility.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-948 RD 1/16/2025 2:25:18 PM



Req. No. 948 Page 3